Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 219.455, is amended to read: 219.455 DEFINITIONS. (a) For purposes of sections 219.45 to 219.53, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Depot company" means a company formed to construct and operate a deleted text begin passenger stationdeleted text end new text begin terminalnew text end on behalf of a railroad or rail carrier. (c) "Passenger service" means both intercity rail passenger service and commuter rail passenger service. (d) "Railway company" means a company incorporated or licensed to operate a railroad track or train, and includes a company that loads, unloads, or transloads products. (e) "Terminal" means a facility or station where: (1) trains stop to load, unload, or transfer passengers, freight, or both; (2) formation, dispatch, reception and temporary stabling, and marshalling of rolling stock occurs; or (3) trains are serviced, maintained, or repaired. (f) "Yard" means a system of tracks within defined limits provided for making up trains, storing cars, and other purposes. (g) "Yard track" means a system of tracks within defined limits used fornew text begin either movements subject to prescribed signals, rules, or other special instructions or the following purposesnew text end : (1) the making up or breaking up of trains; (2) the storing of cars; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ornew text end (3) deleted text begin other related purposes over which movements not authorized by timetable or by train order may be made subject to prescribed signals, rules, or other special instructionsdeleted text end new text begin movements not authorized by timetable or train ordernew text end . Sidings used exclusively as passing track and main line track within yard limits do not constitute yard track.